Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 12. Immigrant Tenant Protection Act

38-12-1201.
Short title.

The short title of this part 12 is the “Immigrant Tenant Protection Act”.

History.

Source:
L. 2020:

Entire part added, (SB 20-224), ch. 187, p. 856, § 1, effective June 30.

38-12-1202.
Definitions.

As used in this part 12, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Dwelling unit” means a structure or the part of a structure that is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by a tenant. “Dwelling unit” includes a mobile home, as defined in section 38-12-201.5 (2).

“Immigration or citizenship status” means a person’s actual or perceived immigration or citizenship status.

“Landlord” means the owner, manager, lessor, or sublessor of a residential premises.

“Rental agreement” means any agreement, written or implied by law, between a landlord and a tenant embodying the terms and conditions concerning the use and occupancy of a residential premises.

“Residential premises” means a structure of which one or more dwelling units are part, including any immediately surrounding property that is owned by or subject to the exclusive control of a person who controls such a dwelling unit.

“Tenant” means a person entitled under a rental agreement to occupy a dwelling unit to the exclusion of others.

“Tenant” includes a prospective tenant or any other person seeking to occupy a dwelling unit to the exclusion of others.

History.

Source:
L. 2020:

Entire part added, (SB 20-224), ch. 187, p. 856, § 1, effective June 30.

38-12-1203.
Prohibition on activities related to a tenant’s immigration or citizenship status.

On and after January 1, 2021, except as otherwise provided in this section or required by law or court order, a landlord shall not:

Demand, request, or collect information regarding or relating to the immigration or citizenship status of a tenant; except that a landlord that is also the tenant’s employer may lawfully collect information required to complete any employment form required by state or federal law;

Disclose or threaten to disclose information regarding or relating to the immigration or citizenship status of a tenant to any person, entity, or immigration or law enforcement agency;

Harass or intimidate a tenant or retaliate against a tenant for:

Exercising the tenant’s rights under this part 12; or

Opposing any conduct prohibited by this part 12;

Interfere with a tenant’s rights under this part 12, including influencing or attempting to influence a tenant to surrender possession of a dwelling unit or to not seek to occupy a dwelling unit based solely or in part on the immigration or citizenship status of the tenant;

Refuse to enter into a rental agreement or to approve a subtenancy, or to otherwise preclude a tenant from occupying a dwelling unit, based solely or in part on the immigration or citizenship status of the tenant; or

Bring an action to recover possession of a dwelling unit based solely or in part on the immigration or citizenship status of a tenant.

History.

Source:
L. 2020:

Entire part added, (SB 20-224), ch. 187, p. 857, § 1, effective June 30.

38-12-1204.
Authorized conduct.

Section 38-12-1203 does not prohibit a landlord from:

Complying with any legal obligation under:

Federal, state, or local law, including any legal obligation under a government program or pursuant to a condition of government funding, if the government program or government funding provides rent limitations or rental assistance to a tenant;

A subpoena;

A warrant; or

A court order of any kind;

Requesting information or documentation necessary to determine or verify the financial qualifications of a prospective tenant, provided the landlord requests the same information or documentation of all prospective tenants regardless of immigration or citizenship status, including requesting a social security number or relevant taxpayer identification number; or

Delivering to the tenant an oral or written notice regarding conduct by the tenant that violates or may violate any applicable rental agreement or law.

Section 38-12-1203 does not enlarge or diminish a landlord’s right to terminate a tenancy pursuant to existing state or local law or the ability of a unit of federal, state, or local government to regulate or enforce a prohibition against a landlord’s harassment of a tenant.

Nothing in this part 12:

Prevents a landlord from seeking to collect rent due under the rental agreement; or

Permits a landlord to violate section 8-2-130.

Any waiver of a right under this part 12 by a tenant is void as a matter of public policy.

History.

Source:
L. 2020:

Entire part added, (SB 20-224), ch. 187, p. 857, § 1, effective June 30.

38-12-1205.
Remedies.

If a landlord engages in prohibited conduct described in section 38-12-1203 against a tenant, the tenant may bring a civil action to seek any one or more of the following remedies:

Compensatory damages for injury or loss suffered;

A civil penalty in an amount not to exceed two thousand dollars for each violation, payable to the tenant;

Costs, including reasonable attorney fees; and

Other equitable relief the court finds appropriate.

Nothing in this part 12 renders the immigration or citizenship status of a tenant relevant to any issue of liability or remedy in a civil action involving a tenant’s housing rights. In proceedings or discovery undertaken in a civil action involving a tenant’s housing rights, no inquiry shall be permitted into the tenant’s immigration or citizenship status unless:

The claims or defenses raised by the tenant place the tenant’s immigration or citizenship status directly in contention; or

The person seeking to make the inquiry demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that the inquiry is necessary in order to comply with federal law.

If a civil action is commenced pursuant to this section, any party to the civil action may demand a trial by jury.

History.

Source:
L. 2020:

Entire part added, (SB 20-224), ch. 187, p. 858, § 1, effective June 30.